Rhode Island, session 2025, SB465.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-4 of the General Laws entitled "Life Insurance Policies and
Reserves" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-4-28.1. Prohibition on preexisting condition exclusion in obtaining life insurance.
(a) A life insurance policy offered, issued, issued for delivery, or issued to cover a resident
of this state by a life insurance company licensed pursuant to this title and/or chapter shall not limit
or exclude coverage for any individual because of a previous denial for coverage or due to
preexisting medical conditions of that individual.
(b) As used in this section, “preexisting condition exclusion” means any limitation or
exclusion of benefits, including a denial of coverage, applicable to an individual as a result of
information relating to an individual’s health status before the individual’s effective date of
coverage, or if the coverage is denied, the date of denial, under the terms of the life insurance
policy, such as a condition (whether physical or mental) identified as a result of a pre-enrollment
questionnaire or physical examination given to the individual, or review of medical records relating
to the pre-enrollment period.
(c) Any preexisting condition exclusion language included in a life insurance application,
binder or life insurance policy issued to or covering a resident of this state is void and
unenforceable.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000289
========
LC000289 - Page 2 of 3